Washington statutes.
RCW 36.82.145

Bicycle paths, lanes, routes, etc., may be constructed, maintained, or improved from county road fund—Standards.

Any funds deposited in the county road fund may be used for the construction, maintenance, or improvement of bicycle paths, lanes, routes, and roadways, and for improvements to make existing streets and roads more suitable and safe for bicycle traffic. Bicycle facilities constructed or modified after December 31, 2012, shall meet or exceed the standards adopted by the design standards committee under RCW 43.32.020.

[ 2012 c 67 s 5; 1982 c 55 s 3; 1974 ex.s. c 141 s 8.]

NOTES:

Intent—2012 c 67: See note following RCW 35.75.060.